Maryland, session 2026, HB1505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
Subtitle 37. Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for Police Officers [and],
Probation Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS.
18–3701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1505*

HOUSE BILL 1505
(B) “CORRECTIONAL OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–201 OF
THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
[(b)] (C) “Eligible employment” means to work as:
(1) A police officer OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER in the State for at least
2 years; or
(2) A parole and probation agent, supervisor, or regional director in the
State for at least 2 years.
[(c)] (D) “Higher education loan” means a loan that is obtained for tuition for
undergraduate study.
[(d)] (E) “Police officer” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of the Public Safety
Article.
[(e)] (F) “Probation agent” means an individual serving as a parole and
probation agent, supervisor, or regional administrator for the Department of Public Safety
and Correctional Services.
[(f)] (G) “Program” means the Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program
for Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS.
18–3702.
(a) There is a Maryland Loan Assistance Repayment Program for Police Officers
[and], Probation Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS in the State.
(b) The Office shall distribute funds from the Program to assist in the repayment
of a higher education loan owed by a police officer [or], probation agent, OR
CORRECTIONAL OFFICER who:
(1) Receives a graduate, professional, or undergraduate degree from a
public college or university in the State;
(2) Obtains eligible employment; and
(3) Satisfies any other criteria established by the Office.
Subtitle 38. Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS Scholarship Program.
18–3801.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.

HOUSE BILL 1505 3
(B) “CORRECTIONAL OFFICER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 8–201 OF
THE CORRECTIONAL SERVICES ARTICLE.
[(b)] (C) “Eligible institution” means:
(1) A public senior higher education institution in the State; or
(2) A community college in the State.
[(c)] (D) “Police officer” has the meaning stated in § 3–201 of the Public Safety
Article.
[(d)] (E) “Probation agent” means an individual serving as a parole and
probation agent, supervisor, or regional administrator for the Department of Public Safety
and Correctional Services.
[(e)] (F) “Service obligation” means to work as a police officer [or], probation
agent, OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER in the State not less than 5 years during the 8–year
period after graduation.
18–3802.
(a) There is a Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship Program.
(b) The purpose of the program is to provide tuition assistance for students who
are:
(1) Attending an eligible institution and enrolled in a degree program that
would further the student’s intent to become a police officer [or], probation agent, OR
CORRECTIONAL OFFICER after graduation; or
(2) Employed as a police officer [or], probation agent, OR CORRECTIONAL
OFFICER, attending an eligible institution, and enrolled in a degree program that would
further the police officer’s [or], probation officer’s, OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER’S career.
(c) The Office shall publicize the availability of the Maryland Police Officers
[and], Probation Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship.
18–3803.
(a) Each year, the Office shall select eligible students and offer a scholarship to
each student selected to be used at an eligible institution of the student’s choice.

HOUSE BILL 1505
(b) A recipient of the Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship shall:
(1) Be a Maryland resident or have graduated from a Maryland high
school;
(2) Be accepted for admission or currently enrolled at an eligible institution
as a full–time or part–time undergraduate or graduate student pursuing a course of study
or program that would further the recipient’s career;
(3) Sign a letter of intent to perform the service obligation on completion of
the recipient’s required studies; and
(4) Satisfy any additional criteria the Commission may establish.
(c) A current police officer [or], probation agent, OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER
shall be eligible for a Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship if they meet the eligibility criteria under
subsection (b) of this section.
18–3804.
The recipient of a Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation Agents, AND
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarship shall repay the Commission the funds received
as set forth in § 18–112 of this title if the recipient does not:
(1) Satisfy the degree requirements of the eligible course of study or
program or fulfill other requirements as provided in this subtitle; or
(2) Perform the service obligation to work as a police officer [or], probation
agent, OR CORRECTIONAL OFFICER for at least 5 years during the 8–year period after
graduation.
18–3807.
The Office shall:
(1) Publicize the availability of Maryland Police Officers [and], Probation
Agents, AND CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS Scholarships; and
(2) To the extent practicable, award scholarships under this subtitle in a
manner that reflects ethnic, gender, racial, and geographic diversity.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.

HOUSE BILL 1505 5